Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4863.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 34. (1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, an estate at will or by sufferance may be terminated by either party by giving 1 month's a 1-month notice to the other party. If the rent reserved in a lease is payable at periods of less than 3 months, the time of notice is sufficient if it is equal to the interval between the times of payment. Notice is not void because it states a day for the termination of the tenancy that does not correspond to the conclusion or commencement of a rental period. The notice terminates the tenancy at the end of a period equal in length to the interval between times of payment. (2) If a tenant neglects or refuses to pay rent on a lease at will or otherwise, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by giving the tenant a written 7-day notice to quit. (3) A tenancy from year to year may be terminated by either party by a notice to quit, given at any time to the other party. The notice shall terminate terminates the lease at the expiration of 1 year from after the time of the service of the notice. (4) If a tenant holds over after a lease is terminated pursuant to under a clause in the lease providing for termination because the tenant, a member of the tenant's household, or other person under the tenant's control has manufactured, delivered, possessed with intent to deliver, or possessed a controlled substance on the leased premises, the landlord may terminate the tenancy by giving the tenant a written 24-hour notice to quit. This subsection applies only if a formal police report has been filed alleging that the person has unlawfully manufactured, delivered, possessed with intent to deliver, or possessed a controlled substance on the leased premises. For purposes of As used in this subsection, "controlled substance" means a substance or a counterfeit substance classified in schedule 1, 2, or 3 pursuant to under sections 7211 to 7216 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7211 to 333.7216. (5) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (4) and subject to the requirement of section 5775 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.5775, that a tenancy in a mobile home park may be terminated only for just cause, a notice purporting to terminate a tenancy in a mobile home park must give the tenant not less than 180 days to quit the premises. As used in this subsection, "mobile home park" means that term as defined in section 5771 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.5771.